Florida, session 2026, SB1432.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSection 112.049, Florida Statutes, is created to 27 read: 28 112.049âHeroes Reward Program.â 29 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 30 (a)ââEmployeeâ means any individual employed by a public 31 employer on a full-time, active basis in a permanent, benefits 32 eligible position. 33 (b)ââPrimary residenceâ means the dwelling the employee 34 intends to occupy as his or her principal and permanent 35 residence. 36 (c)ââPublic employerâ has the same meaning as in s. 37 447.203(2). 38 (2)âNotwithstanding s. 110.219, a public employer may 39 provide an employee a one-time payout of his or her sick or 40 annual leave, or a combination thereof, for the purchase of a 41 primary residence if: 42 (a)âThe payout is used to assist with the purchase of a 43 primary residence and such purchase is evidenced by: 44 1.âA fully executed purchase-and-sale agreement. 45 2.âA final closing disclosure or settlement statement, 46 issued by a licensed closing or escrow agent. This does not 47 include estimated, preliminary, or unsigned documents. 48 (b)âThe employee retains a balance of at least 21 days of 49 accrued sick leave following the payout. 50 (c)âThe employee is able to redeem any requested amount of 51 accrued annual leave, with no maximum cap, provided the employee 52 otherwise meets the requirements of this section. 53 (d)âThe public employer provides the employee with a 54 written statement confirming the one-time, nonrefundable nature 55 of the payout. 56 (3)âA payout under this section is separate from and in 57 addition to the number of hours of accrued annual leave that may 58 be used for purposes of the Deferred Retirement Option Program 59 under s. 121.091. 60 (a)âLeave paid out under this section must be deducted from 61 the employeeâs accrued leave balances at the time of payment and 62 may not later be counted toward any terminal leave payout or 63 other leave conversion program. 64 (b)âAll payments must be made at the employeeâs current 65 base rate of pay and are subject to applicable taxes. A payout 66 under this section is not terminal pay, severance pay, or 67 compensation for purposes of retirement calculations under 68 chapter 121. 69 (c)âAt the employeeâs written request, the employer shall 70 remit the approved payout directly to a licensed closing or 71 escrow agent identified in the final closing disclosure or 72 settlement statement. 73 (d)âUpon receipt of a complete and compliant request from 74 the employee, including a fully executed purchase-and-sale 75 agreement and a final closing disclosure, the employer shall 76 disburse funds by electronic wire transfer to the designated 77 closing or escrow agent no later than 3 business working days 78 after the scheduled closing date. 79 (e)âFunds deposited under this section shall be disbursed 80 solely for allowable home purchase costs at closing. If the 81 transaction does not close, the escrow agent shall return the 82 funds to the employer with 5 business days, and the employeeâs 83 leave balances shall be restored accordingly. 84 (4)(a)âThe Department of Management Services shall adopt 85 rules to implement this section. 86 (b)âA political subdivision may implement this program by 87 ordinance, resolution, written policy, or collective bargaining 88 agreement. 89 (c)âThe program does not require any public employer to 90 establish or maintain the benefit authorized in this section. 91 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.